Utah statutes.
19-6-802.   Legislative findings.

(1)  The Legislature finds that the disposal of waste tires is a matter of statewide concern and that recycling of waste tires should be promoted in light of the health and environmental benefits.

(2)  The Legislature further finds that the recycling of waste tires will decrease the number of tires which are disposed of in landfills and will reduce the health and safety hazards posed by existing stockpiles of waste tires.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature in adopting this part to encourage the development of the recycling industry and the development of markets for recycled products.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 51, 2000 General Session

